Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-1908
Destroy, deface, or remove parts; unlawful; exception; violation; penalty.

No person other than one authorized by the appropriate local authority or state agency shall destroy, deface, or remove any part of a vehicle which is left unattended on a highway or other public place without license plates affixed or which is abandoned. Anyone violating this section shall be guilty of a Class V misdemeanor.

Laws 1971, LB 295, § 8;

Laws 1977, LB 39, § 100;

Laws 1999, LB 90, § 9.